Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3210
Assessor's bond; action to recover upon; by whom brought.

The state, any municipality, or any person aggrieved or injured by the willful neglect of duty by the county assessor or any deputy or assistant assessor may recover upon the officer's bond the amount lost to the state, municipality, or person on account of such neglect of the county assessor or deputy or assistant assessor, together with the costs of suit.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 21, p. 393;

R.S.1913, § 6307;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. IV, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.1929, § 77-401;

R.S.1943, § 77-403;

Laws 1951, c. 260, § 2, p. 886;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-403;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 25.